Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-331 Secured creditor's claims.
(a) The value of any security held by a secured creditor shall be determined
in one of the following ways, as the court may direct:

(1) By converting the same into money according to
the terms of the agreement pursuant to which the security was delivered to such
creditors; or

(2) By agreement, arbitration, compromise or
litigation between the creditor and the liquidator.

(b) The determination shall be under the
supervision and control of the court with due regard for the recommendation of
the liquidator. The amount so determined shall be credited upon the secured
claim, and any deficiency shall be treated as an unsecured claim. If the
claimant shall surrender this security to the liquidator, the entire claim shall
be allowed as if unsecured. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next